New Jersey, session 222, S4008.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  As used in this act, board of education means the board of education of a school district with a high school, the board of trustees of a charter school enrolling students in grades 9 through 12, or the board of trustees of a renaissance school project enrolling students in grades 9 through 12. 2.  a.  Each board of education shall enter into a partnership with one or more apprenticeship programs offered by a labor union in the county.  The purpose of the partnership shall be to improve student exposure to local apprenticeship opportunities. b.  The partnership established pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall develop: (1)  general information on the career pathways available through the partnering apprenticeship program or programs to be distributed to all students enrolled in grades 11 and 12; and (2) a career exploration program designed to raise student awareness of the opportunities available through the partnering apprenticeship program or programs. c.  The career exploration program developed pursuant to paragraph (2) subsection b. of this section shall include a minimum of 25 hours of programming that includes: (1)  a structured orientation session that introduces students to the apprenticeship program or programs, their career pathways and ladders, and a review of salary potential and job security in the industry; and (2) practical experiences designed to develop fundamental trade skills, which may include hands-on skill building, simulator-based training, or interactive classroom lessons. d. Each board of education shall ensure that no less than two percent of students enrolled in its graduating 12th grade class complete the career exploration program developed pursuant to paragraph (2) subsection b. of this section. e.  Each board of education shall submit an annual compliance report to the Commissioner of Education.  The compliance report shall document the boards efforts to meet the requirements of this act and include an assessment of the programs participation data and impact. 3.  a.  The costs related to the implementation of this act may be borne through State aid, federal and other grants, workforce development funding, and private sponsorships. b.  The Commissioner of Education, in consultation with the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development, shall request annually, as part of the annual budget proposal, an amount as may be necessary to fund the costs related to the implementation of this act.  The departments and boards of education shall, as applicable, pursue any available federal, State, local, and private funding. 4.  The Commissioner of Education shall annually report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), on the implementation of the program. 5.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full school year following the date of enactment.